Washington statutes.
RCW 43.72.860

Managed care pilot projects.

(1) The department of labor and industries, in consultation with the workers' compensation advisory committee, may conduct pilot projects to purchase medical services for injured workers through managed care arrangements. The projects shall assess the effects of managed care on the cost and quality of, and employer and employee satisfaction with, medical services provided to injured workers.

(2) The pilot projects may be limited to specific employers. The implementation of a pilot project shall be conditioned upon a participating employer and a majority of its employees, or, if the employees are represented for collective bargaining purposes, the exclusive bargaining representative, voluntarily agreeing to the terms of the pilot. Unless the project is terminated by the department, both the employer and employees are bound by the project agreements for the duration of the project.

(3) Solely for the purpose and duration of a pilot project, the specific requirements of Title 51 RCW that are identified by the department as otherwise prohibiting implementation of the pilot project shall not apply to the participating employers and employees to the extent necessary for conducting the project. Managed care arrangements for the pilot projects may include the designation of doctors responsible for the care delivered to injured workers participating in the projects.

(4) The projects shall conclude no later than January 1, 1997.

[ 1998 c 245 s 79; 1995 c 81 s 2; 1993 c 492 s 486.]